Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.20.320

Marine biological preserve—Established and described—Unlawful gathering of marine biological materials—Penalty.

(1) There is hereby created an area of preserve of marine biological materials useful for scientific purposes, except when gathered for human food, and except, also, the plant nereocystis, commonly called "kelp." Such area of preserve shall consist of the salt waters and the beds and shores of the islands constituting San Juan county and of Cypress Island in Skagit county.

(2) No person shall gather such marine biological materials from the area of preserve, except upon permission first granted by the director of the Friday Harbor Laboratories of the University of Washington.

(3) A person gathering such marine biological materials contrary to the terms of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.

[ 2003 c 53 s 174; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.20.320. Prior: 1923 c 74 s 1; RRS s 8436-1. Formerly RCW 28.77.230.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.